Wisconsin, session 2025, SB311.
do enact as follows:SB311,13Section 1. 20.926 of the statutes is created to read:SB311,2,7420.926 Prohibitions on funding for health services for unlawfully 1present individuals. (1) Except as provided in sub. (2), no funds of this state or 2of any county, city, village, town, or long-term care district under s. 46.2895 or of 3any subdivision or agency of this state, including an authority created in ch. 233, or 4of any subdivision or agency of any county, city, village, or town and no federal funds 5passing through the state treasury shall be authorized for or paid to any person to 6subsidize, reimburse, or otherwise provide compensation for any health care 7services for an individual who is not lawfully present in the United States.SB311,2,98(2) (a) Subsection (1) does not apply to the extent that payment of funds 9described under sub. (1) is required under federal law.SB311,2,1110(b) Subsection (1) shall apply only to the extent that the application of the 11restriction does not result in the loss of any federal funds.SB311,2,1212